fr: Entreprise et industrie > Finance et assurance: Lingot
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 金融・保険: 地金
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 금융/보험: 지금
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Finanzwesen & Versicherung: Bullion
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 金融與保險: 貴重金屬塊/條
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Finansai ir draudimas: Luitai
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Financije i osiguranje: Financijske poluge
sv: Företag och industri > Finans och försäkring: Metalltackor
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Tài chính & Bảo hiểm: Vàng bạc
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Финансы и страхование: Банковские металлы
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Finanse i ubezpieczenia: Sztabki metali szlachetnych
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Talous ja vakuutus: Jalometallit
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Finans ve Sigorta: Külçe Altın
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Financiën en verzekeringen: Goud- en zilverstaven
es: Economía e industria > Finanzas y seguros: Lingotes
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Χρηματοοικονομικά & ασφάλειες: Ράβδοι πολύτιμων μετάλλων
it: Commercio e industria > Finanza e assicurazione: Lingotti
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 金融与保险: 贵金属锭
da: Erhverv og industri > Finans og forsikring: Møntmetal
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Finanças e seguros: Barras de metais valiosos
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Финанси и застраховане: Инвестиционно злато
nb: Forretninger og industri > Finans og forsikring: Gullbarrer
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Finance a pojišťovnictví: Neražené drahé kovy
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Finanțe și asigurări: Lingouri
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Financie a poistenie: Drahé kovy
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Finanças e seguros: Barras de ouro ou prata
en: Business & Industrial > Finance & Insurance: Bullion
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Finance in zavarovanje: Plemenite kovine
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การเงินและการประกันภัย: ทองแท่ง
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Pénzügy és biztosítás: Veretlen érme